Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-5003
Lethal fetal anomaly; physician or nurse practitioner; powers.

A physician or nurse practitioner who diagnoses an unborn child as having a lethal fetal anomaly may:

(1) Inform the pregnant woman, orally and in person, that perinatal hospice services are available and offer or refer for this care; and

(2) Deliver to the pregnant woman in writing the information support sheet provided by the department under section 71-5004.

Laws 2017, LB506, § 3.